Massachusetts, session 194th, S1374.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 149 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following section:- Notwithstanding any general or special law
to the contrary, and specifically notwithstanding section 148C, an employee who is mandated to
quarantine due to COVID-19 or other medical illness by statute or health regulation or the
regulations of their employer shall not be required to use any accrued earned sick time in order to
recover the missed hours due to quarantine.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1